District of Columbia statutes.
10-213.01

Disposition of fees.

Effective June 14, 1980, all fees and receipts from those activities for which the Department of Parks and Recreation determines to charge a fee shall be deposited in the General Fund.

Apr. 29, 1942, ch. 265, art. II, § 4a
as added May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 12, 41 DCR 5193
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 303, 62 DCR 1884
1981 Ed., § 8-213.1.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-271 substituted “Department of Parks and Recreation” for “Department of Recreation and Parks.”
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, November 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the Department of Recreation and Parks shall be known as the Department of Parks and Recreation.